Arkansas, session 2025, HB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-15-101 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language and make stylistic changes:
27-15-101. Decal for deaf persons.
(a) The Department of Finance and Administration shall provide a motor
vehicle license plate decal for deaf persons upon the payment of a fee of one
dollar ($1.00) and satisfactory proof that the person's average loss in the
speech frequencies of five hundred hertz to two thousand hertz (500 Hz-2,000
Hz) in the better ear is eighty-six decibels (86 dB) or worse more by the
International Organization for Standardization.
(b) The department shall design a decal to indicate that the operator
of the motor vehicle may be deaf.
(c) The decals shall be made available beginning September 1, 1985.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-15-316(a), concerning disabled veterans
under the Access to Parking for Persons with Disabilities Act, is amended to
read as follows to repeal obsolete language:
*JLL004*
01/31/2025 10:14:24 AM JLL004

HB1364
(a) As used in this section, “disabled veteran” means a person who
meets the definition of disabled veteran, or disabled veteran — nonservice
injury, or disabled veteran — World War I, under § 27-24-203.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-15-2203(b)(1), concerning the
requirements for vehicle restoration when applying for an antique motor
vehicle license plate, is amended to read as follows to repeal obsolete
language:
(b)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2006, the The Office of Motor Vehicle
shall require the owner of any antique motor vehicle licensed under this
subchapter to provide the Office of Motor Vehicle proof of conformity with
this subchapter.

SECTION 4. The introductory language to Arkansas Code § 27-20-104(a),
concerning the standard equipment required for street-use motor-driving
cycles and motorcycles, is amended to read as follows to repeal obsolete
language:
(a) After July 5, 1977, all All motor-driven cycles and all
motorcycles used upon the public streets and highways of this state shall be
equipped with the following standard equipment:

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 27-23-128 is amended to read as follows to
repeal obsolete language due to the repeal of § 27-50-701 by § 9 of this act
and the repeal of § 16-90-904 by Acts 2013, No. 1480, § 7, and to make
stylistic changes:
27-23-128. Deferment of sentence — Restrictions.
No A circuit court judge or district court judge may not utilize § 5-4-
321, § 16-90-115, § 16-90-904, §§ 16-93-301 — 16-93-303, or § 16-93-314, or §
27-50-701 or any other program to defer imposition of sentence or enter the
person into a diversion program in instances in which the person holds a
commercial driver license or a commercial learner's permit and is charged
with violating any state or local traffic law other than a parking violation.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 27-24-203(4), concerning the definitions
used in relation to special license plates for military service and veterans,
is repealed as obsolete.
01/31/2025 10:14:24 AM JLL004

HB1364
(4) “Disabled veteran — World War I” means a World War I veteran
who:
(A) Received a disabling injury while serving in the
United States Armed Forces during World War I; and
(B) Is either:
(i) The owner of a motor vehicle that is used by or
for the totally and permanently disabled veteran; or
(ii) Furnished a motor vehicle by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 27-50-310(b), concerning the unlawful use
of officially designated school bus colors or the words “school bus”, is
amended to read as follows to clarify a criminal offense and make stylistic
changes:
(b) Any person violating the provisions of subsection (a) shall be
deemed of this section upon conviction is guilty of a misdemeanor violation
and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) and not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 27-50-505(c), concerning the obligation of
an owner of a motor vehicle to provide information regarding the operation of
a motor vehicle ticketed for a violation, is amended to read as follows to
clarify a criminal offense and make stylistic changes:
(c) Failure or refusal of any registered owner of a motor vehicle to
comply with the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor is a
violation. Upon conviction, the person shall be is subject to a fine of not
less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 50, Subchapter 7, is
repealed because its provisions are codified at § 5-4-321.
Subchapter 7 — Trial and Judgment

27-50-701. Postponement of judgment.
In traffic misdemeanor cases, other than cases involving driving under
the influence of alcohol or drugs, the judge shall have authority to postpone
judgment for not more than one (1) year, during which period the defendant
01/31/2025 10:14:24 AM JLL004

HB1364
shall be in a probationary status, supervised or unsupervised, and shall
remain in probationary status until judgment is entered.

27-50-702. Request for entry or postponement of judgment.
(a) At the request of the defendant, parent of a minor defendant, or
counsel for the defense, judgment shall be entered as quickly as feasible and
not more than ten (10) days following such request.
(b) At the request of the defendant, parent of a minor defendant, or
counsel for the defense, probation may be continued and judgment postponed
for more than one (1) year.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 27-50-802 is repealed as obsolete.
27-50-802. Certain speeding convictions not included in report —
Exception for chauffeurs.
(a) All courts in this state required by law to furnish records of
convictions of all motor vehicle violations to the Office of Driver Services
shall continue to furnish the records, but in compiling reports of
convictions of traffic violations, the Office of Driver Services shall not
include in the traffic violation report of any individual any conviction for
the offense of speeding if the conviction is based on speeding upon a public
highway in excess of fifty-five miles per hour (55 m.p.h.) speed limit as
established pursuant to Pub. L. No. 93-239 of January 2, 1974, but less than
seventy-five miles per hour (75 m.p.h.).
(b) The Office of Driver Services shall include in the traffic
violation report of any person holding a chauffeur's license any conviction
for the offense of speeding in excess of the fifty-five miles per hour (55
m.p.h.) speed limit as established pursuant to Pub. L. No. 93-239 of January
2, 1974, to the employer of the person and shall furnish the complete driver
history record of the person pursuant to a written authorization as provided
in § 27-50-908 to the employer of the person holding a chauffeur's license.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 27-50-803 is amended to read as follows to
clarify the section and make stylistic changes:
27-50-803. Notification when minor convicted.
(a) As used in this section, "minor" means a person under eighteen
(18) years of age.
01/31/2025 10:14:24 AM JLL004

HB1364
(b) Whenever any court in this state shall convict any person under
eighteen (18) years of age If a minor is convicted of any moving traffic
violation under the laws of this state, or under any municipal ordinance,
whether the fine and sentence imposed shall be is collected or whether it may
be the fine and sentence imposed is suspended, the convicting court shall
notify in writing the parents, guardian, or other person who signed the
application of the person minor for an instructor's a permit or operator's
license as required by the provisions of under § 27-16-702.
(c) If the convicted person minor does not have an instructor's a
permit or operator's license, the court shall notify the father or mother of
the person minor, if living, or the guardian or other person having custody
of the person minor of the conviction.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 27-67-320 is amended to read as follows to
clarify the section, correct an obsolete reference, and make stylistic
changes:
27-67-320. Acquisition when county court fails to grant petition.
(a) Where If the State Highway Commission petitions any county court
asking for a right-of-way for any state highway and where the county court
fails to grant the petition and to make issue a court order procuring the
right-of-way within sixty (60) days after the petition is presented, then the
commission may take such steps as it the commission deems expedient to
acquire the right-of-way, either by purchase, exercise of its the
commission's right of eminent domain, or otherwise.
(b) In that event If the commission acquires the right-of-way by
purchase, eminent domain, or otherwise, one-half (½) of the cost of acquiring
the right-of-way shall be deducted from the next payment due any the county
by reason of any appropriation out of the State Highway County Aid Fund or
state revenue from gasoline as motor vehicle fuel or auto license tax to the
county or county highway fund of the county.
(c) All suits A suit involving the validity of this section or any
portion of it shall be deemed matters this section is a matter of public
interest and shall be advanced and disposed of at the earliest possible
moment, and appeals in such suits must shall be taken and perfected within
thirty (30) days from the date of the judgment or decree.

01/31/2025 10:14:24 AM JLL004

HB1364
SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 27-101-412(b), concerning sewage disposal
by commercial boating facilities, docks, and marinas, is amended to read as
follows to repeal obsolete language:
(b) By July 1, 2004, any Any person owning or operating a commercial
boating facility, dock, or marina that stores or houses vessels equipped with
toilet facilities and marine sanitation devices shall provide access to
sewage pumpout facilities.

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.











01/31/2025 10:14:24 AM JLL004